Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.130

Wilful refusal to pay warrants—Exceptions—Recovery.

If the state treasurer wilfully refuses to pay except in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.08.070 or by cash or check any warrant designated as payable in the state treasurer's office which is lawfully drawn upon the state treasury, or knowingly pays any warrant otherwise than as provided by law, then any person injured thereby may recover by action against the treasurer and the sureties on his or her official bond.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5043; 1972 ex.s. c 145 s 2; 1965 c 8 s 43.08.130. Prior: 1890 p 644 s 7; RRS s 11026; prior: 1886 p 135 s 8; 1871 p 78 s 8; 1864 p 53 s 8; 1854 p 414 s 8.]